Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 1

Definitions

9-4-101. Collateral.

“Collateral” means eligible collateral pledged by a state depository.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-4-101 (Acts 1919, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 20094¼, 294½; Code 1932, §§ 253, 254; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-401; Acts 1983, ch. 91, § 2), concerning deposit of state funds, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 12. For new law generally, see parts 1-3 of this chapter.

9-4-102. Default.

“Default” may include, but is not limited to:

The failure of any state depository to return any state deposit, including earned interest, in accordance with the terms of the deposit contract;

The failure of any state depository to pay any check, draft or warrant drawn by the state treasurer;

The failure of any state depository to honor any request for electronic transfer of funds to the state;

The failure of any state depository to account for any check, draft, warrant, order, deposit certificate or money entrusted to it by the state;

The issuance of any order of any court or the taking of any formal action by any supervisory authority, which has the effect of restraining a state depository from making payments of deposit liabilities;

The appointment of a receiver for a state depository; or

Any other action which the state treasurer determines to place state deposits in jeopardy.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-4-102 (Code 1858, § 230 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 27, § 10); Shan., § 278; Code 1932, § 222; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 222; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-402; Acts 1983, ch. 91, § 3), concerning deposit of receipts by treasurer, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 12. For new law generally, see parts 1-3 of this chapter.

Cross-References. Default, §9-4-406.

9-4-103. Eligible collateral.

“Eligible collateral” means:

Bonds of the United States or any of its agencies;

Obligations guaranteed by the United States or any of its agencies, the payments of which are fully guaranteed both as to principal and interest by the United States;

Bonds of the state of Tennessee, including any revenue bond issued by any agency of the state specifically including institutions under the control of the state board of regents, the board of trustees of the University of Tennessee and bonds issued in the name of the state school bond authority;

Bonds of any utility district, county or municipal corporation of the state of Tennessee, including bonds payable from revenues (expressly excluding bonds of any road, levee or drainage district) upon which such bonds there has been no default in the payment of interest more than thirty (30) days upon any one (1) installment of interest, for the five (5) years next preceding the deposit of such bonds;

Loans to students guaranteed one hundred percent (100%) by the Tennessee student assistance corporation, during the dormant period of such loan;

Bonds issued under title 7, chapters 37 and 53, or under title 48, chapter 101, part 3, that are rated “A” or higher by any nationally recognized rating service;

In addition, the state treasurer, with the concurrence of the commissioners of finance and administration and of financial institutions, may accept any other collateral security which is acceptable to the secretary of the treasury to secure the United States for deposits of public money in tax and/or loan accounts;

An irrevocable letter of credit issued by the federal home loan bank; provided, that:

The federal home loan bank is rated investment grade by at least one (1) nationally recognized securities rating service; and

The state treasurer may require the state depository to promptly pledge securities in lieu of the letter of credit if the state treasurer believes it necessary to protect public funds;

A surety bond issued by an insurance company licensed under the laws of this state that meets the following:

The company has a financial strength rating, also known as claims-paying ability, in one (1) of the two (2) highest categories by at least one (1) nationally recognized statistical rating agency; and

Any other financial or participation criteria and conditions established by the state funding board;

The company offering the surety bond and the form of the bond is approved by the state funding board;

The amount of surety bond pledged by any one (1) state depository or qualified public depository in lieu of other eligible collateral shall not exceed thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) or fifty percent (50%) of all collateral for that institution required to be pledged to the state treasurer or to the collateral pool, whichever is lower;

The treasurer shall monitor the financial strength rating of a qualified insurance company no less than weekly, and at least annually shall file a report with the state funding board and the collateral pool board on the condition of the qualified insurance company. If the condition of an insurer changes to the extent that the issuer would no longer be qualified under the requirements of subdivision (9)(A), the treasurer shall immediately notify the state funding board and the collateral pool board; and the insurer shall thereafter become disqualified;

In the event an insurer becomes disqualified under subdivision (9)(D), the state depository or qualified public depository using the insurer's surety bond shall be required within thirty (30) days' notice from the treasurer to substitute other eligible collateral or to otherwise meet the required collateral level;

Notwithstanding the disqualification of an insurer under subdivisions (9)(D) and (E), the surety bond of the insurer shall remain in effect until its expiration, nonrenewal or termination as otherwise permitted by law;

In addition to the authority otherwise provided in this section or by law, the state treasurer may require the state depository or qualified public depository to promptly pledge eligible collateral in lieu of the surety bond if the treasurer makes a finding that additional collateral is necessary to protect public funds;

A surety bond authorized in this subdivision (9) may only be used to secure funds in the custody of the state treasurer or to secure funds covered by the collateral pool created under part 5 of this chapter; and

In the event that an issuer of surety bonds desires to withdraw from the program or to terminate a surety bond, the bond issuer shall give the state treasurer and the insured state depository or qualified public depository no less than sixty (60) days' advance notice of the withdrawal, nonrenewal or cancellation of the bonds; or

State or municipal bonds from other states or from municipalities in other states; provided, that:

The bond meets the definition of “qualified tax-exempt obligation” as defined in Section 265(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 265(b)(3));

The bond is rated AA-, Aa3, or a higher rating by a nationally recognized bond rating service;

The bond is not a structured debt instrument; and

If the bond is downgraded below the minimum rating, the state depository shall substitute other eligible collateral or otherwise meet the required collateral levels within two (2) working days.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 15; 1986, ch. 551, § 2; 1994, ch. 586, § 1; 1997, ch. 217, §§ 3, 14; 2009, ch. 6, § 1; 2012, ch. 942, § 1; 2013, ch. 202, § 1; 2018, ch. 752, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-4-103 (Acts 1883, ch. 132, § 1; Shan., § 279; Code 1932, § 223; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 223; Acts 1957, ch. 308, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-403; Acts 1983, ch. 91, § 4), concerning certificates of deposit, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 12. For new law generally, see parts 1-3 of this chapter.

9-4-104. Loss.

“Loss” includes, but is not limited to:

The principal amount of the state deposit;

All accrued interest through the date of default;

Additional interest at the rate the state deposit was earning on the total of subdivisions (1) and (2) through the day of payment to the state by a liquidator or other third party or through the date of sale by the state treasurer or the state treasurer's agent; and

Attorney's fees incurred in recovering state deposits.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-4-104 (Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 26; 1939, ch. 11, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.26; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-404), concerning petty cash accounts, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 12. For new law generally, see parts 1-3 of this chapter.

9-4-105. Required collateral.

“Required collateral” means collateral whose market value is equal to one hundred five percent (105%) of the value of the state deposit secured thereby, less so much of such amount as is protected by the federal deposit insurance corporation.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 17; 1990, ch. 702, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-4-105 (Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 26; 1939, ch. 11, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 55.26; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-405), concerning special federal funds, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 12. For new law generally, see parts 1-3 of this chapter.

9-4-106. State deposit.

“State deposit” means all state funds which are placed in a state depository, plus interest accrued thereon.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-4-106 (Acts 1949, ch. 137, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 252.2 (Williams, § 255.48a); Acts 1971, ch. 249, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-406; Acts 1983, ch. 90, § 1; 1983, ch. 91, § 2), concerning investment in government bonds, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 12. For new law generally, see parts 1-3 of this chapter.

9-4-107. State depository.

“State depository” means:

Any savings bank (savings institution), or any bank chartered by the state of Tennessee;

Any national bank, or federal savings institution that has its main office located in this state; or

Any national or state bank, or any federal or state savings institution that has its main office located outside this state and that maintains one (1) or more branches in this state which are authorized to accept federally insured deposits;

that has been designated by the state treasurer, the governor and the commissioner of finance and administration as a state depository.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an automated teller machine or such other similar type receptacle or device shall not be considered a branch for purposes of this section.

Whenever the satisfactory conduct of the state's business clearly demands it, and not otherwise, a bank, savings institution or trust company that does not otherwise meet the requirements in subsection (a) may be designated as a state depository by the state treasurer, the governor and the commissioner of finance and administration. In the event it becomes necessary to designate such a bank, savings institution or trust company, the department or agency seeking such designation shall make a written request to the officials enumerated above, giving in detail the necessity for the designation and all other information the officials deem material. Any bank, savings institution or trust company designated under this subsection (b) shall be deemed a state depository only for the specific purpose for which it was designated and shall not be recognized as a state depository for any other purpose.

A bank, savings institution or trust company located outside this state shall not be eligible to be designated as a state depository pursuant to this section unless the bank, savings institution or trust company:

Agrees that this chapter shall govern in determining its rights and responsibilities as a state depository; and

Agrees to be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state, or of the courts of the United States which are located within this state, for the purpose of any litigation arising out of this chapter.

Notwithstanding § 12-4-108 to the contrary, the public official described in § 12-4-108(b) shall have the power to enter into a trust agreement with any savings institution or bank described in subsection (a) for the safekeeping, custodial care and servicing of securities substituted for retained funds pursuant to § 12-4-108.

It is the duty of the commissioner of financial institutions to make inquiry, on a timely basis, of the primary regulatory authority respecting the condition and safety of each out-of-state state chartered bank and of each out-of-state state chartered savings institution as a state depository, and to advise the state treasurer and the commissioner of finance and administration of the results. Such inquiry shall be made on at least an annual basis.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 19; 1986, ch. 551, § 11; 1986, ch. 923, § 1; 1989, ch. 183, § 1; 1997, ch. 217, § 15; 2001, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-4-107 (Acts 1869-1870, ch. 81, § 6; Shan., § 268; Code 1932, § 212; C. Supp. 1950, § 212; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-407), concerning interest accounts kept by commissioner of finance and administration, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 12. For new law generally, see parts 1-3 of this chapter.

Attorney General Opinions. Designation of a branch of an out-of-state bank as a state depository, OAG 97-031, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30 (3/31/97).

9-4-108. Trustee custodian.

“Trustee custodian” means any bank or federal reserve bank or branch thereof or the federal home loan bank which the state treasurer has designated as trustee custodian to hold eligible collateral on behalf of the state treasurer. Such designation by the state treasurer of a bank other than a federal reserve bank or the federal home loan bank shall be submitted to the commissioners of financial institutions and finance and administration for their concurrence.

Financial institutions located outside this state shall be eligible to apply to be designated as trustee custodians pursuant to subsection (a); provided, that the financial institution:

Is approved to serve as a trustee custodian to hold collateral pledged to secure United States treasury tax and loan accounts;

Agrees that the laws of this state shall govern in determining its rights and responsibilities as a trustee custodian; and

Agrees to be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state, or of the courts of the United States which are located within this state, for the purpose of any litigation arising out of this chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 20; 1990, ch. 702, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-4-108 (Code 1958, § 219 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 12, § 13); Shan., § 265; Code 1932, § 209; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 209; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-408), concerning copies of commissioner of finance and administration's records, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 12. For new law generally, see parts 1-3 of this chapter.